Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB329.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Lyme Disease and Related Tick-Borne Disease Continuing Education Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Licensee." A physician, physician assistant or nurse practitioner."Licensing board." The State Board of Medicine, the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine or the State Board of Nursing."Lyme disease." Signs or symptoms compatible with acute, late-stage, persistent infection with Borrelia burgdorferi or complications related to the infection or with other strains of Borrelia, including B. miyamotoi, B. mayonii, B. garinii and B. afzelii, that are recognized by the United States Centers for 20250SB0329PN0298 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Disease Control and Prevention as a cause of Lyme disease. The term includes infection that meets the surveillance criteria established by the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and other acute and persistent manifestations of the infection as determined by a health care practitioner."Related tick-borne disease." The presence of signs or symptoms compatible with infection with bartonella, babesiosis/piroplasmosis, anaplasmosis, ehrlichiosis, Rocky Mountain spotted fever, rickettsiosis, Powassan or other tick-transmissible illness or complications related to the infections. The term does not include Lyme disease.Section 3. Continuing education requirement.(a) License renewal.--A licensing board shall require that a licensee complete at least two hours of continuing education in the assessment and diagnosis of and treatment options for Lyme disease and other related tick-borne diseases as a portion of the total continuing education required for license renewal.(b) Content.--A licensing board shall establish the content of continuing medical education required under this section. The content shall address, at a minimum, the most current, evidence-based research on tick data and pathogens Statewide, patient profile and symptom presentation in regards to assessment and diagnosis, current diagnostic options and current treatment options and prevention.(c) Input.--In establishing the content required for continuing medical education required under this section, the licensing board shall seek input from persons with knowledge about Lyme disease or related tick-borne diseases, including universities involved in the research of Lyme disease and related tick-borne diseases. To ensure quality and balanced 20250SB0329PN0298 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 medical education, the licensing board shall consider the philosophies of the United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the guidelines established by the National Institutes of Health, the International Lyme and Associated Diseases Society and the Infectious Diseases Society of America, as well as the latest scientific evidence and research.Section 4. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to provide treatment recommendations for Lyme disease or related tick-borne disease.Section 5. Regulations.Not later than 18 months after the effective date of this section, the licensing board shall promulgate regulations necessary to effectuate this act.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0329PN0298 - 4 - 123456789101112131415